Wisconsin, session 2025, AB296.
do enact as follows:AB296,11Section 1. 812.33 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB296,2,62812.33 (1) The creditor shall pay a $15 fee to the garnishee for each earnings 3garnishment or each stipulated extension of that earnings garnishment, except that 4there is no fee for a garnishment to satisfy an order for restitution under s. 973.20 5(1r). This fee shall be included as a cost in the creditor’s claim in the earnings 6garnishment.AB296,27Section 2. 812.35 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB296,2,148812.35 (5) Upon being served, the garnishee shall determine whether the 9garnishee may become obligated to the debtor for earnings earned within pay 10periods beginning within 13 weeks after the date of service. If it is unlikely that the 11garnishee will become so obligated, the garnishee shall send a statement of that 12fact to the creditor by the end of the 7th business day after receiving the earnings 13garnishment form under sub. (3). The creditor shall send a copy of this statement 14to the court within 7 business days after receipt of the statement.AB296,315Section 3. 812.35 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB296,3,916812.35 (6) If the garnishee may become obligated to the debtor for earnings 17earned within pay periods beginning within 13 weeks after the date of service, but 18one or more earnings garnishments against the debtor have already been served on 1the garnishee and not terminated, the garnishee shall retain the earnings 2garnishment form and place the garnishment into effect the pay period after the 3last of any prior earnings garnishments terminates. The garnishee shall notify the 4debtor of the amount of the garnishment and shall notify the creditor of the amount 5owed on the pending garnishments by the end of the 7th business day after receipt 6of the garnishment form under sub. (3). If, before the earnings garnishment takes 7effect, the garnishee determines that it is unlikely that the garnishee will continue 8to be obligated to the debtor for earnings, the garnishee shall notify the creditor and 9court under sub. (5) within 7 business days after making that determination.AB296,410Section 4. 812.35 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB296,3,1911812.35 (7) Upon being served, the garnishee shall determine whether the 12debtor's address as shown in the earnings garnishment form received under sub. (3) 13is consistent with the debtor’s address in the garnishee’s records, and, if it is not 14consistent, the garnishee shall notify the creditor in writing by the end of the 7th 15business day after receiving the earnings garnishment form of the current address 16of the debtor in the garnishee's records. If the creditor is notified of a different 17address of the debtor under this subsection, the creditor shall serve on the debtor at 18that address, by one of the means listed under sub. (3) (a) 1. to 3., copies of the 19information required to be served under subs. (3) (a) and (4) (b).AB296,520Section 5. 812.38 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB296,4,821812.38 (2) A motion or petition under sub. (1) may be made at any time during 22the pendency of the earnings garnishment. Within 5 business days after a motion 23or petition is filed under sub. (1), the court shall schedule the matter for a hearing 24to be held as promptly as practicable. The court shall notify the parties of the time 1and place of the hearing. Upon conclusion of the hearing, the court shall make 2findings of fact and conclusions of law. The court shall make such order as required 3by these findings and conclusions. If the order permits the garnishment to proceed, 4the date on which the order is served upon the garnishee shall substitute for the 5original date of service of the garnishment upon the garnishee under s. 812.35 (3) 6for the purpose of determining any 13-week period under s. 812.35 (5) or (6). A 7court order shall bind the garnishee from the time the order is served upon him or 8her the garnishee.AB296,69Section 6. 812.39 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB296,4,1410812.39 (1) Between 5 and 10 business days after the payday of each pay period 11in which the debtor’s earnings are subject to the earnings garnishment, the 12garnishee shall, subject to the exemption under s. 812.34 (2) and except as provided 13in subs. (2) and (2m), pay the creditor that portion of the debtor’s nonexempt 14disposable earnings to which the creditor is entitled.AB296,715Section 7. 812.39 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 812.39 (2) (a) and 16amended to read:AB296,5,517812.39 (2) (a) Court-ordered assignments of the debtor’s earnings for support 18or maintenance under ch. 767, regardless of the date the garnishee first receives 19notice of the assignment, take priority over an earnings garnishment under this 20subchapter. If and take priority over a garnishment to satisfy an order for 21restitution under s. 973.20 (1r). Except as provided in par. (b), if the debtor’s 22earnings are subject to assignment under s. 767.75, the creditor, including a 23creditor entitled to an earnings garnishment to satisfy an order for restitution 24under s. 973.20 (1r), shall not be entitled to an amount greater than 25 percent of 1the debtor’s disposable earnings less the amount assigned under s. 767.75. If the 2garnishee determines that the amount to be garnisheed pursuant to an order under 3s. 767.75 is equal to or greater than 25 percent of the debtor’s disposable earnings, 4the garnishee shall notify the creditor and the court under s. 812.35 (5) within 7 5business days after making that determination.AB296,86Section 8. 812.39 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB296,5,107812.39 (2) (b) If an earnings garnishment is in effect for a debtor whose 8earnings are subject to assignment under s. 767.75, the garnishee shall, if the 9amount assigned under s. 767.75 is less than 25 percent of the debtor’s disposable 10earnings, do all of the following:AB296,5,12111. Determine the difference between 25 percent of the debtor’s disposable 12income and the sum of the following:AB296,5,1313a. The amount assigned under s. 767.75.AB296,5,1514b. The amount, if any, to be garnisheed to satisfy an order for restitution 15under s. 973.20 (1r).AB296,5,17162. If the difference determined under subd. 1. is less than 25 percent of the 17debtor’s disposable income, pay the difference under subd. 1. to the creditor.AB296,5,20183. If the difference determined under subd. 1. is 25 percent or more of the 19debtor’s disposable income, notify the creditor and the court under s. 812.35 (5) 20within 7 business days after making that determination.AB296,921Section 9. 812.39 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB296,6,622812.39 (2m) (a) Court-ordered garnishment of the debtor’s earnings to satisfy 23an order for restitution under s. 973.20 (1r), regardless of the date the garnishee 1first receives notice of the court-ordered garnishment, takes priority over an 2earnings garnishment under this subchapter. Subject to sub. (2), and except as 3provided in pars. (b) and (c), if the debtor’s earnings are subject to garnishment 4under s. 973.20 (1r), the creditor shall not be entitled to an amount greater than 20 5percent of the debtor’s disposable earnings less the amount to be garnisheed 6pursuant to court order under s. 973.20 (1r).AB296,6,97(b) If an earnings garnishment is in effect for a debtor who owes restitution 8under s. 973.20 (1r), the garnishee shall, subject to sub. (2) and except as provided 9in par. (c), do all of the following:AB296,6,12101. Determine the difference between 20 percent of the debtor’s disposable 11income and the amount to be garnisheed to satisfy an order for restitution under s. 12973.20 (1r).AB296,6,13132. Pay the creditor the amount determined under subd. 1.AB296,6,1714(c) If the garnishee determines that the amount to be garnisheed pursuant to 15court order under s. 973.20 (1r) is equal to or greater than 20 percent of the debtor’s 16disposable earnings, the garnishee shall notify the creditor and the court under s. 17812.35 (5) within 7 business days after making that determination.AB296,1018Section 10. 812.395 of the statutes is created to read:AB296,6,2219812.395 Garnishment of earnings remains in effect; notices to debtor. 20(1) A garnishment of earnings payable to a debtor, including a debtor who owes 21victim restitution ordered under s. 973.20 (1r), remains valid and effective until the 22judgment is satisfied, unless sooner terminated by order of the court.AB296,7,623(2) For a garnishment of earnings that extends beyond a 13-week period, 1following the first 13-week period the creditor shall, at least 3 business days before 2the payday of the first pay period of each subsequent 13-week period during the 3effective period of a garnishment and until the judgment is satisfied or the 4garnishment is terminated by order of the court, serve the earnings garnishment 5form issued by the clerk of courts under s. 812.35 (2) upon the debtor by one of the 6following means:AB296,7,77(a) First class mail.AB296,7,88(b) Certified mail, return receipt requested.AB296,7,109(c) Any means permissible for the service of a summons in a civil action, other 10than publication.AB296,7,1511(3) No later than 180 days after an earnings garnishment proceeding is 12commenced, and every 180 days thereafter until the judgment is satisfied, the 13garnishment is terminated by order of the court, or 5 years has elapsed since the 14garnishment takes effect, whichever occurs first, the creditor shall send to the 15debtor by first class mail to the debtor’s last known address all of the following:AB296,7,1816(a) An exemption notice that is substantially in the form of the notice under s. 17812.44 (4) but that omits the information regarding the total amount of the 18creditor’s claim.AB296,7,1919(b) An answer form under s. 812.44 (5).AB296,7,2020(c) The schedules and worksheets adopted under s. 812.34 (3).AB296,1121Section 11. 812.40 of the statutes is repealed.AB296,1222Section 12. 812.405 of the statutes is repealed.AB296,1323Section 13. 812.42 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB296,1424Section 14. 812.44 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB296,8,21812.44 (3) The earnings garnishment form issued by the clerk under s. 812.35 2(2) shall be in substantially the following form:AB296,8,33STATE OF WISCONSINAB296,8,44CIRCUIT COURT: .... County Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab296 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab296 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB296 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB296 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB296: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting